Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3410.01
Budget limitation adopted prior to April 11, 1981; termination.

Any limitation placed on a budget pursuant to the Local Option Tax Control Act prior to April 11, 1981, which has been in effect for two or more fiscal years shall not apply to any budget for a fiscal year commencing after April 11, 1981. Any limitation placed on a budget pursuant to the Local Option Tax Control Act prior to April 11, 1981, which has been in effect for less than two fiscal years shall be terminated after a total of two fiscal years unless terminated prior to such date pursuant to section 77-3410.

Laws 1981, LB 17, § 7.